Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 12.1 Retiree Health Care Trust Fund

36-12.1-1.
Name of act.

This act shall be known as the “Health Insurance and Benefits Funding Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-2.
Statement of purpose.

The purpose of the Health Insurance and Benefits Funding Act is to address the necessity of funding the State’s unfunded liability for retiree health care benefits required by recent accounting changes and prudent resource management.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-3.
Background.

The general assembly finds that the State faces a significant unfunded liability associated with its retiree health care benefits programs. To date, the State has been funding retiree health care benefits on a pay-as-you-go basis. Recently established governmental accounting standards applicable to the State require that the State account for such unfunded costs on an accrued actuarial basis. An actuarial study conducted by the State shows that the State faces an unfunded future liability for retiree health care benefits in excess of six hundred million dollars ($600,000,000). The creation and eventual funding of a dedicated trust fund for the purpose of financing this liability on accrued actuarial basis is fiscally prudent and will produce significant benefits to the State.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-4.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases as used in the act, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, shall have the following meanings:

“Actuary” means the actuary retained by the OPEB Board pursuant to §

36-12.1-15

hereof.

“Alternate retirement plans” shall mean those retirement plans provided by the Board of Governors for Higher Education for its non-classified employees, and those of the Office of Higher Education, the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, and the Community College of Rhode Island, pursuant to §

16-17.1-1

et seq.

“Code” means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

“Employee” means all persons who are classified employees as the term “classified employee” is defined under §

36-3-3

, and all persons in the unclassified and non-classified service of the state. This includes those non-classified employees of the Board of Governors for Higher Education, the Office of Higher Education, the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, and the Community College of Rhode Island pursuant to §

16-59-1

et seq., who are participants in the Board of Governors’ alternate retirement plans.

“Employer” means the state of Rhode Island.

“GAAP” shall mean generally accepted accounting principles.

“GASB” shall mean governmental accounting standards board.

“GASB 43” shall mean the rules promulgated by GASB governing the manner in which financial statements issued by trusts providing OPEB benefits must be prepared in accordance with GAAP, as they may be amended from time to time.

“GASB 45” shall mean the rules promulgated by GASB governing the manner in which financial statements issued by employers providing OPEB Benefits must be prepared in accordance with GAAP, as they may be amended from time to time.

“OPEB” or “OPEB Benefits” shall mean other post employment benefits, and shall include, without limitation, retiree medical, dental, prescription, vision care, life insurance, long term care benefits and similar post-employment benefits for a Retired Employee and/or his or her Dependants.

“OPEB Board” shall mean the board established in §

36-12.1-7

to administer the OPEB System.

“OPEB System” shall mean the Rhode Island Employee’s OPEB System as defined in §

36-12.1-5

.

“OPEB Trust” shall mean the trust fund or funds, including any sub-funds or sub-trusts created by the OPEB Board pursuant to § 36-12 to hold assets of the OPEB System.

“Party in Interest” shall mean each member of the OPEB Board, each employee of the OPEB Board, any individual or organization that renders advice to the OPEB Board or the OPEB System; any affiliate of such organization, and any member of the immediate family of any such individual.

“Retired Employee”, means any person retired from the active service of the state, as determined by the retirement board under §

36-8-1

, and also all retired teachers who have elected to come under the OPEB System, or any person who was a non-classified employee of the Board of Governors for Higher Education, the Office of Higher Education, the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, or the Community College of Rhode Island pursuant to §

16-59-1

et seq, and who is a participant in the Board of Governors’ alternate retirement plans.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 32.

36-12.1-5.
Establishment of OPEB system.

An OPEB System is hereby established and placed under the management of the OPEB Board for the purpose of providing and administering OPEB Benefits for Retired Employees of the State of Rhode Island and their dependants under the provisions of chapter 36-12, entitled “Insurance Benefits”, of this title, and for retired non-classified employees who are participants in the Board of Governors for Higher Education’s alternate retirement plans. The OPEB System so created shall begin operation as of July 1, 2010. It shall have the power and privileges of a corporation and shall be known as the “Rhode Island State Employees’ and Electing Teachers OPEB System” and by that name all of its business shall be transacted.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 4, § 1.

36-12.1-6.
Responsibility for administration — rules and regulations.

The general administration and the responsibility for the proper operation of the OPEB System and for making effective the provisions of chapter 36-12 of this title are hereby vested in an OPEB Board. The OPEB Board shall, from time to time, establish rules and regulations for the administration and transaction of the business of the OPEB System. Rules and regulations which have been or may be established pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be compiled, codified, and published so that they shall be generally available to the members of the system. The OPEB Board shall also perform such other functions as are required for the execution of chapters 12, 12.1 and 12.2 of this title. In its discretion, the OPEB Board may issue regulations governing the application of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-7.
Composition of the OPEB board.

The OPEB Board shall consist of the State Controller, the State Budget Officer, the State Personnel Administrator and the General Treasurer, or their designees.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 32.

36-12.1-8.
Meetings of the OPEB board.

Meetings shall be held at such place as may be designated in the call of the meeting, provided at no cost to the state, at the call of the chairperson.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-9.
Duties of the OPEB board.

The OPEB Board shall be responsible for the administration and operation of the OPEB System, determination of the amount of annual contributions, and oversight of OPEB Benefit payments to Retired Employees and their dependents. The OPEB Board shall have the power to collect contributions from the State of Rhode Island, quasi-public agencies or any municipality thereof, to direct benefit payments, the right to research, question, investigate and make recommendation of findings to the department of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 21, § 1.

36-12.1-10.
Votes of board — Record of proceedings.

Each member of the board shall be entitled to one vote in the board and a majority of all the votes of the entire board shall be necessary for a decision of the board. The board shall keep a record of all the proceedings which shall be open to public inspection.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-11.
Reimbursement of board members.

Members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for any necessary expenditures and no employee shall suffer any loss of salary or wages through serving upon the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-12.
Annual report and statement.

The OPEB Board shall submit to the governor for transmittal to the general assembly, on or before the first day of October in each year beginning in 2011, an annual report showing the financial transactions of the system for the fiscal year of the state next preceding said date. The report shall contain, among other things, a statement of plan net assets, a statement of changes in plan net assets, a valuation balance sheet as prepared by the actuary on a schedule in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and other statistical data as are deemed necessary for a proper interpretation of the condition of the system and the results of its operations. The report shall also embody such other data as may be of use in the advancement of knowledge concerning state employee OPEB and any recommendations of the board for changes in the laws pertaining to the system. The OPEB Board shall cause to be published for distribution among the members of the system a financial statement summarizing the results of operations for the fiscal year. All financial statements issued by the OPEB Board shall conform to the requirements of GAAP.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 21, § 1.

36-12.1-13.
Executive officers and secretary.

The Board shall elect a Chairperson and Secretary. Moreover, the State Controller shall serve as the Treasurer.

Any negotiated agreement entered into after July 1, 2010, between any state or municipal agency or department and an employee or employees, whose conditions are contrary to the general laws or the rules, regulations, and policies as adopted and promulgated by the OPEB Board shall be null and void.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 21, § 1.

36-12.1-14.
Accounts and statistical records — Clerical and professional assistance — Disbursements.

The State Controller, under the direction and supervision of the OPEB Board, shall be charged with the establishment and maintenance of such accounts and statistical records as the OPEB Board may require and he or she shall employ such clerical assistance as shall be necessary to carry out properly the provisions of chapters 12, 12.1 and 12.2 of this title. The OPEB Board shall secure the services of an actuary who shall be the actuarial advisor of the board and who shall make the actuarial computations and valuations required by chapters 12, 12.1 and 12.2. The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sum or sums as may from time to time be necessary, upon receipt by him or her of vouchers for payment of liabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-15.
Payment of administrative expenses of the OPEB board and maintaining the OPEB system — Restricted receipts account.

There is hereby created within the general fund a restricted receipt account entitled the “OPEB system restricted receipt account”, the proceeds of which shall be used solely to pay the expenses of the OPEB Board, the cost of maintaining the OPEB System, and the costs of administering the OPEB System.

For fiscal years 2011 through 2014, the State Controller is authorized to disburse from the fund established under subsection (a) above the actual cost of administration of the fund. In fiscal years, 2015 and thereafter, there shall be transferred to this restricted receipt account twenty five (25) basis points or two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), whichever is greater, where one hundred (100.0) basis points equals one percent (1.0%), of the average total investments before lending activities as reported in the annual report of the auditor general for the next preceding five fiscal years. Any non-encumbered funds on June 30 of any fiscal year shall be credited to the OPEB System.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 21, § 1.

36-12.1-16.
Collection of actuarial and experience data.

The General Treasurer and the state Retirement System, shall collect and keep in convenient form such data as shall be necessary for the preparation of the mortality and service tables and for the compilation of such other information as shall be required for the actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the OPEB System and to comply with the requirements of GASB 43 and 45.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-17.
Actuarial investigations authorized by board.

Immediately after his or her selection, the actuary shall make such investigation of the mortality, service, and compensation experience of the members as the OPEB Board shall authorize for the purpose of determining the proper tables to be prepared and submitted to the OPEB Board for adoption.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-18.
Periodic actuarial investigations and valuations.

Every two years beginning with fiscal year 2012 on a schedule in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, the actuary shall make an actuarial investigation into the mortality, service, and compensation experience of the members and beneficiaries of the OPEB System, and shall make a valuation of the assets and liabilities of the system, and, taking into account the result of the investigation and valuation, the OPEB Board shall:

Adopt for the OPEB System, such mortality, service, and other tables as shall be deemed necessary in the OPEB System; and

Certify the levels of contribution payable by the state of Rhode Island to carry out the provisions of chapters 12, 12.1, and 12.2 of this title.

Certify the levels of contribution payable by the Board of Governors for Higher Education to carry out the provisions of chapter 17.1 of title 16.

On the basis of such tables as the OPEB Board shall adopt, the actuary shall make a valuation of the liabilities of the funds of the system created by this chapter and the investment advisor or investment manager appointed by the OPEB Board shall make a valuation of the assets of the OPEB System.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 21, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 32.

36-12.1-19.
State contributions.

The State of Rhode Island shall make its contribution for the maintenance of the system, including the proper and timely payment of benefits, by annually appropriating an amount equal to a percentage of the total compensation paid to the active membership and teacher payroll base. The percentage shall be computed by the actuary employed by the OPEB Board and shall be certified by the OPEB Board to the director of administration on or before the fifteenth day of October in each year, beginning in 2011. In arriving at the yearly employer contribution the actuary shall determine the value of:

The contributions made by the members;

Income on investments; and

Other income of the system.

The Actuary shall thereupon compute the yearly employer contribution that will:

Pay the actuarial estimate of the normal cost for the next succeeding fiscal year;

Amortize the unfunded liability of the system as of June 30, 2006 utilizing a time period not to exceed thirty (30) years.

The State of Rhode Island shall remit to the general treasurer the employer’s share of the contribution for state employees, state police, legislators, and judges on a payroll frequency basis, and for teachers in a manner consistent with sound accounting and actuarial practice.

The Board of Governors for Higher Education shall remit to the general treasurer that employer’s share of the contribution for its non-classified employees, and those of the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, and the Community College of Rhode Island, pursuant to §

16-17.1-1

et seq., and in a manner consistent with sound accounting and actuarial practice.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 4, § 1.

36-12.1-20.
Establishment of OPEB trust funds.

The OPEB Board shall establish one or more trust funds and/or sub trusts to hold the assets of the OPEB System, to be known as the Rhode Island OPEB System Trust. Title and legal ownership of all assets of the OPEB System shall be in the name of the Rhode Island OPEB System Trust. The OPEB Board, or its delegate is authorized to execute one or more trust instruments to effectuate the purposes of this section. However, such trust instruments shall require that: a) all funds held by such trusts shall be used solely to pay benefits pursuant to the OPEB System, and reasonable and legitimate administrative expenses associated therewith; b) no asset of the OPEB System or contribution made by the State of Rhode Island, may be recovered or returned to the State, until the OPEB Board has certified all liabilities of the System have been satisfied; and c) at no time shall the assets of the Rhode Island OPEB System Trust shall be subject to the claims of the creditors of the State of Rhode Island or the creditors of any beneficiary of the OPEB System.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-21.
Custody and investment of funds.

All money immediately required for the payment of OPEB Benefits shall be invested only in accordance with the written objectives and guidelines established by the state investment commission pursuant to the provisions of chapter 10 of title 35 and other applicable law.

All money not immediately required for the payment of OPEB Benefits shall be invested in accordance with the provisions of chapter 10 of title 35 and other applicable law and shall be held in a custodial or trust account in accordance with §

36-12.1-5

. The trust and custodial account established under this section shall be maintained pursuant to written documents which expressly provide that it shall be impossible at any time prior to the satisfaction of all liabilities with respect to employees and their beneficiaries for any part of the corpus or income to be used for or diverted to purposes other than the payment of OPEB Benefits to employees and their beneficiaries (except as otherwise permitted by § 36-12.1).

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-22.
Disposition of investment earnings.

The OPEB Board shall credit all earned investment income from interest and dividends on investments and bank deposits during any fiscal year to the Rhode Island OPEB System Trust.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-23.
Improper interest in investments of board.

Except as herein provided, no member of the OPEB Board and no employee of the OPEB Board shall have any interest, direct or indirect, in the gains or profits of any investment made by the OPEB Board, nor as such directly or indirectly receive any pay or emolument for his or her services. No member of the OPEB Board or employee of the OPEB Board shall, directly or indirectly, for himself or herself or as an agent, in any manner use the gains or profits, except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the OPEB Board; nor shall any member or employee of the OPEB Board become an endorser or surety or become in any manner an obligor for money loaned or borrowed from the OPEB Board. No member of the OPEB Board shall permit the OPEB System to engage in a transaction that constitutes a sale or exchange, or leasing, of any property between the OPEB System and a party in interest; a lending of money or other extension of credit between the OPEB System and a party in interest; furnishing of goods, services, or facilities between the OPEB System and a party in interest; transfer to, or use by or for the benefit of, a party in interest, of any assets of the OPEB System.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-24.
Payment of OPEB benefits.

All OPEB Benefits shall be paid from the Rhode Island OPEB System Trust, subject to the oversight and approval of the OPEB Board.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-25.
Annual audits.

The auditor general shall conduct upon the request of the OPEB Board a separate annual performance audit of the OPEB System which shall include a report on the actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the OPEB System. The auditor general may examine all records, files, and other documents, and evaluate all policies and procedures for purposes of conducting the audit. The aforementioned performance audit shall be in addition to the annual audit conducted by the auditor general of the financial statements of the OPEB System. A copy of the report shall be given to the governor and the OPEB Board.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-26.
Internal revenue code qualification.

Intent. It is intended that the OPEB System and the Rhode Island OPEB System Trust satisfy the requirements of § 115 or § 501(c)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as amended from time to time, 26 U.S.C. §§ 115, 501(c)(9) -, (hereinafter referred to as the “Code”), in form and operation, to the extent that those requirements apply to a governmental use trust under § 115 or a voluntary employee benefit association under § 501(c)(9) of the Code. To this end, the following provisions shall be applicable, administered, and interpreted in a manner consistent with maintaining the tax qualification of the OPEB System, and shall supersede any conflicting provisions of chapters 12, 12.1 and 12.2 of this title, [of chapter 16 of title 16, or of chapter 21 of title 45].

Exclusive benefit. All funds of the OPEB System shall be held in one or more trusts as provided in §

36-12.1-21

or if permitted, in accordance with § 401(f) of the code [26 U.S.C. § 401(f)], in one or more custodial accounts treated as trusts or a combination thereof. Under any trust or custodial account, it shall be impossible at any time prior to the satisfaction of all liabilities with respect to employees and their beneficiaries, for any part of the corpus or income to be used for, or diverted to, purposes other than the payment of OPEB allowances and other post employment benefits to Retired Employees and their beneficiaries.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-27.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter 36-12.1 of this title, any rule, or regulation made thereunder, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction the remainder of this chapter, rules, or regulations and the application of those provisions to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections of those chapters shall not affect the validity of the remainder of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 3.

36-12.1-28.
Implementation.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the provisions of Chapter 36-12.1 entitled “Retiree Health Care Trust Fund” shall be implemented by July 1, 2010.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 4, § 2.